Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
B. Types of Memberships — Members' Rights and Obligations

§ 17-19-610.
Differences in rights and obligations of members.

All members shall have the same rights and obligations with respect to voting, dissolution, redemption and transfer, unless the articles or bylaws establish classes of membership with different rights or obligations. All members shall have the same rights and obligations with respect to any other matters, except as set forth in or authorized by the articles or bylaws.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 17-19-611.
Transfers.

Except as set forth in or authorized by the articles or bylaws, no member of a mutual benefit corporation may transfer a membership or any right arising therefrom.

No member of a public benefit or religious corporation may transfer a membership or any right arising therefrom.

Where transfer rights have been provided, no restriction on them shall be binding with respect to a member holding a membership issued prior to the adoption of the restriction unless the restriction is approved by the members and the affected member.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 17-19-612.
Member's liability to third parties.

A member of a corporation is not, as such, personally liable for the acts, debts, liabilities or obligations of the corporation.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 17-19-613.
Member's liability for dues, assessments and fees.

A member may become liable to the corporation for dues, assessments or fees as a condition for remaining a member. An article, bylaw or corporate resolution authorizing dues, assessments or fees is not, by itself, sufficient to impose liability without the consent or acquiescence of the member.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Imposition of dues, assessments, or fees. —

The power under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 17-19-302(a)(xiv) for a corporation to impose dues, assessments, admission and transfer fees upon its members, must be read in pari materia with §

17-19-613

, which provides that an article, bylaw or corporate resolution authorizing dues, assessments or fees is not, by itself, sufficient to impose liability without the consent or acquiescence of the member. Goglio v. Star Valley Ranch Ass'n, 2002 WY 94, 48 P.3d 1072,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 100

(Wyo. 2002), overruled in part, LS v. JEQ (In re Order Imposing Sanctions on Mears), 2018 WY 109, 426 P.3d 824,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 2018).

§ 17-19-614.
Creditor's action against member.

No proceeding may be brought by a creditor to reach the liability, if any, of a member to the corporation unless final judgment has been rendered in favor of the creditor against the corporation and execution has been returned unsatisfied in whole or in part or unless such proceeding would be useless.

All creditors of the corporation, with or without reducing their claims to judgment, may intervene in any creditor’s proceeding brought under subsection (a) of this section to reach and apply unpaid amounts due the corporation. Any or all members who owe amounts to the corporation may be joined in such proceeding.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.